Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.37
Administrator; state office building; powers.

After July 1, 1974, the administrator is authorized to enter into an agreement with the city of Lincoln, Nebraska, pursuant to the provisions of sections 72-1401 to 72-1408, providing for the supplying by the city of Lincoln to the State of Nebraska of a state office building to be located on block 91, original plat of Lincoln, Nebraska, and the providing of parking facilities for motor vehicles and related services on the north half of blocks 92 and 96, all in the original plat of Lincoln, Nebraska. The administrator is authorized to convey to the city of Lincoln all of the real estate described herein for the purposes described.

Laws 1973, LB 447, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1973, § 72-716.04;

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 28.